Utah statutes.
17-30-11.   Probationary period of appointment.

(1)  Any peace officer appointed under Section 17-30-10 shall serve a probationary period of 12 consecutive months, during which time he may be discharged by the appointing authority.

(2)  The probationary period shall be extended beyond the 12 months under Subsection (1) as necessary for an officer who has not yet satisfactorily completed an approved peace officer training program and also received a certificate of completion, under Title 53, Chapter 6, Peace Officer Standards and Training Act.

(3) (a)  Continuance in the position after the expiration of the probationary period constitutes a permanent appointment.

(b)  Service under a temporary or emergency appointment is not considered as part of the probationary period.

(4)  A person removed during the probationary period may not be placed on the eligible register again without having passed another regular examination.

